Vermont, session 2025-2026, H866.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 7551 is amended to read:
§ 7551. IMPOSITION OF BAIL, SECURED APPEARANCE BONDS, AND
APPEARANCE BONDS
(a) Bonds; generally. A bond given by a person charged with a criminal
offense or by a witness in a criminal prosecution under section 6605 of this
title, conditioned for the appearance of the person or witness before the court
in cases where the offense is punishable by fine or imprisonment, and in
appealed cases, shall be taken to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court
where the prosecution is pending and shall remain binding upon parties until
discharged by the court or until sentencing. The person or witness shall appear
at all required court proceedings.
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 3 of 27
(b) Limitation on imposition Imposition of bail, secured appearance bonds,
and appearance bonds.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, no bail,
secured appearance bond, or appearance bond may be imposed:
(A) at the initial appearance of a person charged with a misdemeanor
if the person was cited for the offense in accordance with Rule 3 of the
Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure; or
(B) at the initial appearance or upon the temporary release pursuant
to Rule 5(b) of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure of a person charged
with a violation of a misdemeanor offense that is eligible for expungement
pursuant to subdivision 7601(4)(A) of this title.
(2) In the event the court finds that imposing bail is necessary to
mitigate the risk of flight from prosecution for In the case of a person
defendant charged with a violation of a misdemeanor offense that is eligible
for expungement sealing pursuant to subdivision 7601(4)(A) of this title, the
court may impose bail in a maximum amount of $200.00 $1,000.00 if the court
finds that imposing bail is necessary for one or more of the following purposes:
(A) to mitigate risk of flight from prosecution;
(B) to reasonably ensure protection of the public;
(C) to reasonably ensure protection of a victim or witness; or
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 4 of 27
(D) to address concerns identified in the release recommendation of
the law enforcement officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense.
The $200.00 limit shall not apply to an offense allegedly committed by a
defendant who has been released on personal recognizance or conditions of
release pending trial for another offense.
(3)(2) This subsection shall not be construed to restrict the court’s
ability to impose conditions on such persons to reasonably mitigate the risk of
flight from prosecution or to reasonably protect the public in accordance with
section 7554 of this title defendants for the purposes set forth in subdivisions
(1)(A)–(D) of this subsection.
(c) Mandatory detention and enhanced bail for repeat offenders.
(1) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section and except as
provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the following defendants shall
be held without bail:
(A) a defendant who has failed to appear at a court proceeding two or
more times in the previous five years;
(B) a defendant who was previously convicted of three or more
offenses in the previous five years;
(C) a defendant who has four or more pending charges, including the
offense charged;
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 5 of 27
(D) a defendant who was arrested for the offense charged while
released on bail in another pending case;
(E) a defendant who was previously convicted of five or more
misdemeanor offenses in the previous three years;
(F) a defendant who was previously convicted of two or more felony
offenses in the previous five years;
(G) a defendant charged with a crime involving domestic violence
who was previously convicted of or charged with one or more crimes
involving domestic violence in the previous seven years;
(H) a defendant who was previously convicted of three or more
alcohol-related or drug-related offenses in the previous five years;
(I) a defendant charged with a felony offense while on release after
being charged with a felony offense;
(J) a defendant charged with a violent offense while on release after
being charged with any other offense;
(K) a defendant charged with a drug trafficking or drug distribution
offense while on release after being charged with any other offense; and
(L) a defendant in subdivisions (A)–(K) of this subdivision (1) who is
released on bail, on personal recognizance, or subject to conditions of release
and who is charged with any new offense.
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 6 of 27
(2) For persons identified in subdivisions (1)(A)–(L) of this subsection,
the judicial officer may set bail in the following amounts for the purposes set
forth in subdivisions (b)(1)(A)–(D) of this section:
(A) for a defendant who failed to appear at a court proceeding two or
more times in the previous five years, an amount not less than:
(i) $1,000.00 if the defendant previously failed to appear at a court
proceeding two times in the previous five years;
(ii) $2,000.00 if the defendant previously failed to appear at a
court proceeding three times in the previous five years; and
(iii) $3,000.00 if the defendant previously failed to appear at a
court proceeding four or more times in the previous five years;
(B) for a defendant who was previously convicted of three or more
offenses in the previous five years, an amount not less than:
(i) $2,500.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of three
offenses in the previous five years;
(ii) $5,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of four
offenses in the previous five years; and
(iii) $7,500.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of five or
more offenses in the previous five years;
(C) for a defendant who has four or more pending charges, including
the charged offense, an amount not less than:
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 7 of 27
(i) $5,000.00 if the defendant has four pending charges, including
the charged offense;
(ii) $10,000.00 if the defendant has five pending charges,
including the charged offense; and
(iii) $15,000.00 if the defendant has six or more pending charges,
including the charged offense;
(D) for a defendant who was arrested for the charged offense while
released on bail in another pending case, an amount not less than:
(i) $5,000.00 if the defendant was arrested one time for a new
offense while released on bail in a pending case;
(ii) $10,000.00 if the defendant was arrested two times for a new
offense while released on bail in a pending case; and
(iii) $15,000.00 if the defendant was arrested three or more times
for a new offense while released on bail in a pending case;
(E) for a defendant who was previously convicted of five or more
misdemeanor offenses in the previous three years, an amount not less than:
(i) $7,500.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of five
misdemeanor offenses in the previous three years;
(ii) $15,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of six
misdemeanor offenses in the previous three years; and
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 8 of 27
(iii) $22,500.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of
seven or more misdemeanor offenses in the previous three years;
(F) for a defendant who was previously convicted of two or more
felony offenses in the previous five years, an amount not less than:
(i) $10,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of two
felony offenses in the previous five years;
(ii) $20,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of three
felony offenses in the previous five years; and
(iii) $30,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of four
or more felony offenses in the previous five years;
(G) for a defendant charged with an offense involving domestic
violence who was previously convicted of or charged with one or more
offenses involving domestic violence in the previous seven years, an amount
not less than:
(i) $5,000.00 if the defendant was previously charged with or
convicted of one offense involving domestic violence in the previous seven
years;
(ii) $10,000.00 if the defendant was previously charged with or
convicted of two offenses involving domestic violence in the previous seven
years; and
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 9 of 27
(iii) $20,000.00 if the defendant was previously charged with or
convicted of three or more offenses involving domestic violence in the
previous seven years;
(H) for a defendant who was previously convicted of three or more
alcohol-related or drug-related offenses in the previous five years, an amount
not less than:
(i) $3,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of three
alcohol-related or drug-related offenses in the previous five years;
(ii) $6,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of four
alcohol-related or drug-related offenses in the previous five years; and
(iii) $12,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of five
or more alcohol-related or drug-related offenses in the previous five years;
(I) for a defendant charged with a felony offense while on release
after being charged with a felony offense, an amount not less than:
(i) $15,000.00 if the defendant was not previously convicted of a
felony offense;
(ii) $30,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of one
felony offense; and
(iii) $50,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of two
or more felony offenses;
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 10 of 27
(J) for a defendant charged with a violent offense while on release
after being charged with any other offense, an amount not less than:
(i) $20,000.00 if the defendant was not previously charged with a
violent offense while on release after being charged with another offense;
(ii) $40,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of one
violent offense; and
(iii) $50,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of two
or more violent offenses;
(K) for a defendant charged with a drug trafficking or drug distribution
offense while on release after being charged with any other offense, an amount
not less than:
(i) $25,000.00 if the defendant was not previously charged with a
drug trafficking or drug distribution offense while on release after being
charged with another offense;
(ii) $50,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of one
drug trafficking or drug distribution offense; and
(iii) $100,000.00 if the defendant was previously convicted of two
or more drug trafficking or drug distribution offenses; and
(L) for a defendant identified in subdivisions (1)(A)–(K) of this
subsection (c) who is charged with any new criminal offense while on bail,
personal recognizance, or subject to conditions of release, an amount not less
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 11 of 27
than twice the amount specified in subdivisions (A)–(K) of this subdivision
(c)(2).
(d) Judicial determination that detention without bail is not warranted;
factors, written justification.
(1) In determining whether to impose mandatory detention without bail
or enhanced bail amounts, the judicial officer shall consider the following:
(A) the number and frequency of prior offenses of which the
defendant was previously convicted and with which the defendant is charged,
including all of the following:
(i) the number of the defendant’s prior convictions;
(ii) the number of the defendant’s pending charges;
(iii) the number of times the defendant failed to appear at a court
proceeding;
(iv) the number of offenses the defendant committed per year; and
(v) any pattern of escalating or de-escalating criminal behavior by
the defendant;
(B) the nature and circumstances of the offenses of which the
defendant was previously convicted and with which the defendant is charged,
including all of the following:
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 12 of 27
(i) whether the charged offense is a felony or misdemeanor;
(ii) whether each offense of which the defendant was previously
convicted is a felony or misdemeanor;
(iii) whether the offenses of which the defendant was previously
convicted and with which the defendant is charged involve violence committed
by the defendant;
(iv) whether the offenses of which the defendant was previously
convicted and with which the defendant is charged are against persons or
property;
(v) whether a weapon was used in the commission of the offenses
of which the defendant was previously convicted and with which the defendant
is charged;
(vi) whether the offenses of which the defendant was previously
convicted and with which the defendant is charged involve bodily injury to
victims; and
(vii) the level of threat to public safety posed by the offenses of
which the defendant was previously convicted and with which the defendant is
charged;
(C) the risk assessment and recommendation of the law enforcement
officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense, including all of the
following:
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 13 of 27
(i) the recommendation of the law enforcement officer who
arrested or cited the defendant for the offense that the defendant be detained
without bail or that a certain bail amount should be imposed;
(ii) the risk assessment of the law enforcement officer who
arrested or cited the defendant for the offense, including whether the defendant
cooperated with law enforcement, was under the influence of alcohol or
another substance at the time of the offense, or poses a risk to the public;
(iii) any flight risk indicators observed by the law enforcement
officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense;
(iv) any threats made by the defendant during the arrest;
(v) the defendant’s history of which the law enforcement officer
who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense has knowledge; and
(vi) the risk factors identified in the affidavit of the law
enforcement officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense; and
(D) the defendant’s circumstances, the protection of the public, and
the protection of a victim or witness, including all of the following:
(i) whether the defendant complied with prior conditions of
release;
(ii) the defendant’s ties to the community, including the
defendant’s employment status and family;
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 14 of 27
(iii) the defendant’s history of substance abuse;
(iv) the defendant’s mental health status;
(v) the protection of a victim or witness;
(vi) the protection of the public; and
(vii) the risk of nonappearance at future court proceedings.
(2) If the judicial officer sets an enhanced bail amount instead of
holding the defendant without bail, the judicial officer shall make written
findings on the record explaining:
(A) the factors the judicial officer considered;
(B) why detention without bail is not necessary even though the
defendant committed one or more prior offenses;
(C) how the bail amount and conditions of release will mitigate flight
risk and protect the public; and
(D) if the judicial officer’s determination is not consistent with the
release recommendation of the law enforcement officer who arrested or cited
the defendant for the offense, why the judicial officer’s determination is not
consistent with the release recommendation of the law enforcement officer.
(e) Advisory bail by law enforcement officer who arrested or cited the
defendant for the offense binding on judicial officer in certain circumstances.
The law enforcement officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the
offense may provide a release recommendation to the judicial officer based on
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 15 of 27
the law enforcement officer’s observations of the defendant’s behavior, flight
risk indicators, and history.
(1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(2) of this section, if the law
enforcement officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense
recommends that the defendant be held without bail, the judicial officer shall
hold the defendant without bail.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, if the law
enforcement officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense
recommends that bail should be imposed, the judicial officer shall impose bail
in the amount recommended by the law enforcement officer, provided the law
enforcement officer submits an affidavit that details the defendant’s risk
factors and the judicial officer finds the law enforcement officer’s
recommendation supported by the evidence. The law enforcement officer who
arrested or cited the defendant for the offense shall not recommend and the
judicial officer shall not impose bail in an amount greater than $25,000.00 for a
misdemeanor offense or greater than $100,000.00 for a felony offense.
(f) Expedited hearing for defendant to present evidence. At the initial bail
hearing, a defendant held without bail under subsection (c) of this section may
request an expedited hearing at which the defendant may present evidence
regarding the factors listed in subsection (d) of this section. If the defendant
requests a hearing, a hearing shall be held within 72 hours after the initial bail
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 16 of 27
determination, excluding weekends and holidays. At the hearing, a judicial
officer shall hear the defendant’s evidence and review whether the defendant
should be held without bail as provided in subsection (c).
(g) Automatic forfeiture of bail upon arrest for new offense. A defendant
who has been released pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) of this section who is
charged with a new offense while on release shall automatically forfeit all bail
posted for the defendant’s previous charges. The defendant shall be subject to
the provisions of subdivisions (c)(2)(A)–(L) of this section for the new offense
and all pending charges.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 7554 is amended to read:
§ 7554. RELEASE PRIOR TO TRIAL
(a) Release; conditions of release. Any person charged with an offense,
other than a person held without bail under section 7553 or 7553a of this title,
shall may at the person’s appearance before a judicial officer be ordered
released pending trial in accordance with this section.
(1) The defendant shall may only be ordered released on personal
recognizance or upon the execution of an unsecured a secured appearance bond
in an amount specified by the judicial officer unless if the judicial officer
determines that such a release will not reasonably mitigate the risk of flight
from prosecution as required achieve the purposes set forth in subdivisions
7551(b)(1)(A)–(D) of this title. In determining whether the defendant presents
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 17 of 27
a risk of flight from prosecution making this determination, the judicial officer
shall consider, in addition to any other factors, the seriousness of the offense
charged; the number of offenses with which the person is charged; whether, at
the time of the current offense or arrest, the defendant was released on
conditions or personal recognizance, on probation, furlough, parole, or other
release pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or completion of a sentence for an
offense under federal or state law; and whether, in connection with a criminal
prosecution, the defendant is compliant with court orders or has failed to
appear at a court hearing; the protection of the public; the protection of a
victim or witness; and the concerns identified in the release recommendation of
the law enforcement officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense.
If the judicial officer determines that the defendant presents a risk of flight
from prosecution, a risk to the public, a risk to a victim or witness, or a concern
identified in the release recommendation of the law enforcement officer who
arrested or cited the defendant for the offense, the officer shall, either in lieu of
or in addition to the methods of release in this section, impose the least
restrictive of the following conditions or the least restrictive a combination of
the following conditions that will reasonably mitigate the risk of flight of the
defendant as required achieve the purposes set forth in subdivisions
7551(b)(1)(A)–(D) of this title:
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 18 of 27
(A) Place the defendant in the custody of a designated person or
organization agreeing to supervise the defendant if the defendant is charged
with an offense that is not a nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony as
defined in 28 V.S.A. § 301.
(B) Place restrictions on the travel or association of the defendant
during the period of release.
(C) Require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program. The judicial officer shall take into consideration the
defendant’s ability to comply with an order of treatment and the availability of
treatment resources.
(D) Upon consideration of the defendant’s financial means, require
Require the execution of a secured appearance bond in a specified amount and
the deposit with the clerk of the court, in cash or other security as directed, of a
sum not to exceed 10 percent of the amount of the bond, such deposit to be
returned upon the appearance of the defendant as required.
(E) Upon consideration of the defendant’s financial means, require
Require the execution of a surety bond with sufficient solvent sureties, or the
deposit of cash in lieu thereof.
(F) Impose any other condition found reasonably necessary to
mitigate the risk of flight achieve the purposes set forth in subdivisions
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 19 of 27
7551(b)(1)(A)–(D) of this title as required, including a condition requiring that
the defendant return to custody after specified hours.
(G) [Repealed.]
(H) Place the defendant in the pretrial supervision program Pretrial
Supervision Program pursuant to section 7555 of this title, provided that the
defendant meets the criteria identified in subdivisions 7555(d)(2)–(3)
7555(d)(2) and (3) of this title.
(I) Place the defendant in the home detention program Home
Detention Program pursuant to section 7554b of this title.
(2) If the judicial officer determines that conditions of release imposed
to mitigate the risk of flight will not reasonably protect the public or address
concerns identified in the release recommendation of the law enforcement
officer who arrested or cited the defendant for the offense, the judicial officer
may impose, in addition, the least restrictive of the following conditions or the
least restrictive a combination of the following conditions that will reasonably
ensure protection of the public and address concerns identified in the release
recommendation of the law enforcement officer who arrested or cited the
defendant for the offense:
(A) Place the defendant in the custody of a designated person or
organization agreeing to supervise the defendant if the defendant is charged
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 20 of 27
with an offense that is not a nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony as
defined in 28 V.S.A. § 301.
(B) Place restrictions on the travel, association, or place of abode of
the defendant during the period of release.
(C) Require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program. The judicial officer shall take into consideration the
defendant’s ability to comply with an order of treatment and the availability of
treatment resources.
(D) Impose any other condition found reasonably necessary to
protect the public, except that a physically restrictive condition may only be
imposed in extraordinary circumstances and address concerns identified in the
release recommendation of the law enforcement officer who arrested or cited
the defendant for the offense.
(E) Suspend the officer’s duties in whole or in part if the defendant is
a State, county, or municipal officer charged with violating section 2537 of this
title and the court finds that it is necessary to protect the public.
(F) [Repealed.]
(G) Place the defendant in the pretrial supervision program Pretrial
Supervision Program pursuant to section 7555 of this title, provided that the
defendant meets the criteria identified in subdivisions 7555(d)(2)–(3)
7555(d)(2) and (3) of this title.
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 21 of 27
(H) Place the defendant in the home detention program Home
Detention Program pursuant to section 7554b of this title.
(3) If the defendant satisfies the criteria in subdivisions (A)–(H) of this
subdivision, a judicial officer shall impose the conditions as required in
subdivisions (A)–(H) of this subdivision.
(A) If a defendant failed to appear at a court proceeding two or more
times in the previous five years, the judicial officer shall:
(i) place the defendant under surveillance and electronic
monitoring by the Department of Corrections, including the use of passive
electronic monitoring;
(ii) place the defendant in the Pretrial Supervision Program
pursuant to section 7555 of this title, provided that the defendant meets the
criteria identified in subdivisions 7555(d)(2) and (3) of this title, and require
the defendant to report on a daily basis to the Department of Corrections; and
(iii) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program.
(B) If the defendant was previously convicted of three or more
offenses in the previous five years, the judicial officer shall:
(i) place the defendant under surveillance and electronic
monitoring by the Department of Corrections, including the use of passive
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 22 of 27
electronic monitoring, or place the defendant in the Home Detention Program
pursuant to section 7554b of this title;
(ii) place the defendant in the Pretrial Supervision Program
pursuant to section 7555 of this title, provided that the defendant meets the
criteria identified in subdivisions 7555(d)(2) and (3) of this title, and require
the defendant to report on a weekly basis to the Department of Corrections;
and
(iii) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program.
(C) If the defendant has four or more pending criminal charges,
including the charged offense, the judicial officer shall:
(i) place the defendant under surveillance and electronic
monitoring by the Department of Corrections, including the use of passive
electronic monitoring;
(ii) place the defendant in the Pretrial Supervision Program
pursuant to section 7555 of this title, provided that the defendant meets the
criteria identified in subdivisions 7555(d)(2) and (3) of this title;
(iii) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program; and
(iv) place restrictions on the travel of the defendant during the
period of release to the county of the defendant’s residence.
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 23 of 27
(D) If the defendant violated release conditions in the previous three
years, the judicial officer shall:
(i) place the defendant in the Home Detention Program pursuant
to section 7554b of this title;
(ii) place the defendant in the Pretrial Supervision Program
pursuant to section 7555 of this title, provided that the defendant meets the
criteria identified in subdivisions 7555(d)(2) and (3) of this title;
(iii) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program; and
(iv) require the defendant to abstain from consuming alcohol,
which the Department of Corrections may enforce through random testing.
(E) If the defendant is charged with an offense involving domestic
violence and was charged with or convicted of an offense involving domestic
violence in the previous seven years, the judicial officer shall:
(i) require that the defendant not contact the victim or victims;
(ii) place the defendant under surveillance and electronic
monitoring by the Department of Corrections, including the use of passive
electronic monitoring, with designated exclusion zones;
(iii) require the defendant to participate in a domestic violence
treatment program; and
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 24 of 27
(iv) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program.
(F) If the defendant was previously convicted of five or more
misdemeanor offenses in the previous three years, the judicial officer shall:
(i) place the defendant in the Pretrial Supervision Program
pursuant to section 7555 of this title, provided that the defendant meets the
criteria identified in subdivisions 7555(d)(2) and (3) of this title;
(ii) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program;
(iii) require the defendant to report in person each week to the
Department of Corrections; and
(iv) require the defendant comply with a curfew between 10:00
p.m. and 6:00 a.m.
(G) If the defendant was charged with a felony while on release after
being charged with a felony offense, the judicial officer shall:
(i) place the defendant under surveillance and electronic
monitoring by the Department of Corrections, including the use of passive
electronic monitoring;
(ii) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program; and
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 25 of 27
(iii) place restrictions on the association of the defendant with any
co-defendants during the period of release.
(H) If the defendant was previously convicted of three or more
alcohol-related or drug-related offenses in the previous five years, the judicial
officer shall:
(i) require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug
treatment program;
(ii) require the defendant to submit to random drug and alcohol
testing at least two times each week;
(iii) place the defendant under surveillance and electronic
monitoring by the Department of Corrections, including the use of passive
electronic monitoring, or place the defendant in the Home Detention Program
pursuant to section 7554b of this title; and
(iv) require the defendant to abstain from consuming alcohol or
visiting establishments that primarily serve alcohol.
(4) A judicial officer may shall order that a defendant not harass or
contact or cause to be harassed or contacted a victim or potential witness. This
order shall take effect immediately, regardless of whether the defendant is
incarcerated or released.
(b) Judicial considerations in imposing conditions of release. In
determining which conditions of release to impose:
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 26 of 27
(1) In subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the judicial officer, on the basis
of available information, shall take into account the nature and circumstances
of the offense charged; the weight of the evidence against the accused
defendant; the accused’s defendant’s employment; financial resources,
including the accused’s ability to post bail; the accused’s defendant’s character
and mental condition; the accused’s defendant’s length of residence in the
community; and the accused’s defendant’s record of appearance at court
proceedings or of flight to avoid prosecution or failure to appear at court
proceedings; and the protection of the public.
(2) In subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the judicial officer, on the basis
of available information, shall take into account the nature and circumstances
of the offense charged; the weight of the evidence against the accused
defendant; the accused’s defendant’s family ties, employment, character and
mental condition, length of residence in the community, record of convictions,
and record of appearance at court proceedings or of flight to avoid prosecution
or failure to appear at court proceedings; whether, at the time of the current
offense or arrest, the defendant was released on conditions or personal
recognizance, on probation, furlough, parole, or other release pending trial,
sentencing, appeal, or completion of a sentence for an offense under federal or
state law; and whether, in connection with a criminal prosecution, the
defendant is compliant with court orders or has failed to appear at a court
VT LEG #386499 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.866
2026 Page 27 of 27
hearing; and the protection of the public. Recent history of actual violence or
threats of violence may be considered by the judicial officer as bearing on the
character and mental condition of the accused defendant.
(3) In subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the judicial officer, on the basis
of available information, shall take into account whether the defendant is a
repeat or chronic offender and the protection of the public and public
resources. The judicial officer may impose enhanced conditions based on
whether the defendant was previously convicted of three or more misdemeanor
offenses in the previous two years, whether the defendant was previously
convicted of five or more misdemeanor offenses in the previous five years,
whether the defendant was previously convicted of two or more felony
offenses in the previous five years, whether the defendant has four or more
pending charges, whether the defendant previously failed to appear at a court
proceeding two or more times in the previous five years, and whether the
defendant has a pattern of committing similar offenses, defined as being
convicted of three or more offenses of the same type in the previous three
years.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386499 v.1